Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.270

Licensed practical nurse—Activities allowed. (Effective until June 30, 2027.)

A licensed practical nurse under his or her license may perform nursing care, as that term is usually understood, of the ill, injured, or infirm, and in the course thereof may, under the direction of a licensed physician and surgeon, osteopathic physician and surgeon, dentist, naturopathic physician, podiatric physician and surgeon, physician assistant, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or midwife acting under the scope of his or her license, or at the direction and under the supervision of a registered nurse, administer drugs, medications, treatments, tests, injections, and inoculations, whether or not the piercing of tissues is involved and whether or not a degree of independent judgment and skill is required, when selected to do so by one of the licensed practitioners designated in this section, or by a registered nurse who need not be physically present; if the order given is reduced to writing within a reasonable time and made a part of the patient's record. Such direction must be for acts within the scope of licensed practical nurse practice.

[ 2020 c 80 s 19; 2012 c 13 s 4; 1995 c 295 s 2; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 427.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 80 ss 12-59: See note following RCW 7.68.030.

Intent—2020 c 80: See note following RCW 18.71A.010.

Effective date—1995 c 295: See note following RCW 18.79.260.

PDFRCW 18.79.270

Licensed practical nurse—Activities allowed. (Effective June 30, 2027.)

A licensed practical nurse under his or her license may perform nursing care, as that term is usually understood, of the ill, injured, or infirm, and in the course thereof may, under the direction of a licensed physician and surgeon, osteopathic physician and surgeon, dentist, naturopathic physician, podiatric physician and surgeon, physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, or midwife acting under the scope of his or her license, or at the direction and under the supervision of a registered nurse, administer drugs, medications, treatments, tests, injections, and inoculations, whether or not the piercing of tissues is involved and whether or not a degree of independent judgment and skill is required, when selected to do so by one of the licensed practitioners designated in this section, or by a registered nurse who need not be physically present; if the order given is reduced to writing within a reasonable time and made a part of the patient's record. Such direction must be for acts within the scope of licensed practical nurse practice.

[ 2024 c 239 s 16; 2020 c 80 s 19; 2012 c 13 s 4; 1995 c 295 s 2; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 427.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 239: See note following RCW 18.79.030.

Effective date—2020 c 80 ss 12-59: See note following RCW 7.68.030.

Intent—2020 c 80: See note following RCW 18.71A.010.

Effective date—1995 c 295: See note following RCW 18.79.260.